Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6379.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2567a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), the county register of deeds shall collect a fee for recording any instrument. Before January 1, 2043, the fee is $4.00. Beginning January 1, 2043, the fee is $2.00. The fee must be paid when the instrument is left for record. (2) The fee required by this section is in addition to any fees required in section 2567 or fees or charges otherwise required by law for the recording of instruments. (3) The fees collected under this section must be remitted to the state treasurer quarterly, and must be deposited by the state treasurer in the state survey and remonumentation fund created in section 11 of the state survey and remonumentation act, 1990 PA 345, MCL 54.271, except that a county may retain not more than 1-1/2% of each fee collected under subsection (1) to cover the costs of administering this section. (4) If, pursuant to a contract under section 8(5) of the state survey and remonumentation act, 1990 PA 345, MCL 54.268, a county has expended funds to expedite the completion of its county plan, the county may apply not more than 50% of its the county's annual grant revenue under section 12(1)(a) of the state survey and remonumentation act, 1990 PA 345, MCL 54.272, to reimburse itself for these expenditures, until these expenditures have been fully reimbursed. (5) This section does not apply to any of the following: (a) An agency of this state when filing or recording any instrument with the county register of deeds under the state tax lien registration act, 1968 PA 203, MCL 211.681 to 211.687. (b) An individual or any public or private legal entity when recording a lien or discharge of a lien with the county register of deeds under section 15 of the Michigan employment security act, 1936 (Ex Sess) PA 1, MCL 421.15. (c) An agency of the federal government when filing or recording any instrument with the county register of deeds under the uniform federal lien registration act, 1983 PA 102, MCL 211.661 to 211.668. (d) An individual or any public or private legal entity when recording any instrument with the county register of deeds under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.9994.440.12501. (e) A foreclosing governmental unit when recording any instrument required under sections 78 to 78o 79a of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.78 to 211.78o.211.79a. (6) As used in this section, "county plan" means a monumentation and remonumentation plan under section 8 of the state survey and remonumentation act, 1990 PA 345, MCL 54.268. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.